Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,103
University of Nebraska, College of Medicine; travel expense of senior medical students, residents, interns; conditions.

The dean of the College of Medicine of the University of Nebraska may authorize the expenditure of funds when appropriated by the Legislature for travel expenses of senior medical students, medical residents, and interns to communities in Nebraska for the purpose of locating in Nebraska to practice their profession. Payments shall be limited to one hundred dollars for a round trip visit and not more than three such visits shall be approved for any one student, medical resident, or intern. The College of Medicine shall keep records to show the result of such expenditures. The expenses paid shall be in accordance with expense practices of the state government and as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees.

Laws 1972, LB 1489, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 218.